Alabama, session 2026rs, HB609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 41-23-100 and 41-23-101, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§41-23-100
(a) The Neighbors Helping Neighbors Fund is established
in the State Treasury to provide eligible recipients
weatherization assistance.
(b) The monies in the fund shall consist of any of the
following:
(1) Contributions from taxpayers received by the
Department of Revenue and transferred to the fund.
(2)(1) Appropriations from made by and at the
discretion of the Legislature.
(3)(2) Other revenue sources made by and at the
discretion of the Legislature.
(3) Donations from private sourcesProceeds from any
gifts, grants, or contributions.
Page 1

gifts, grants, or contributions.
HB609 Enrolled
(4) Interest earned on principal remaining in the fund.
(5) Any other lawful sources.
(c) The monies in the fund shall not revert to the
General Fund at the end of the fiscal year."
"§41-23-101
(a) Eligible recipients of assistance are individuals
who have a household income at or below 125 200 percent of the
poverty level or individuals who are 60 years of age or older
or handicapped and families with children under 18 years of
age as determined by the United States Office of Management
and Budget and reported in the federal register.
(b) Beginning July 1, 1996, the The Director of the
Department of Economic and Community Affairs shall provide
assistance funds to designated community action agencies and
county governments currently providing may contract with
statewide resiliency organizations to provide energy
assistance to people individuals who are eligible to receive
assistance under this article. Disbursement of assistance
funds shall be coordinated with all other state and federal
home weatherization assistance programs administered by the
Department of Economic and Community Affairs.
(c) An amount of not more than 10 percent of the fund
monies may be used for administrative costs in providing
services specified under this article.
(d) On or before October 15 of each year, the director
shall submit a report to the appropriate legislative
committees. The report shall include a summary of the total
monies collected and distributed under this article and such
Page 2

monies collected and distributed under this article and such
HB609 Enrolled
other information as the legislative committees may request.
(e) For purposes of this section, "statewide resiliency
organization" means an Alabama nonprofit corporation in the
state that:
(1) Is exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. §
501(c)(3);
(2) Is charged with improving the resiliency, energy
efficiency, and safety of the state's residential housing
stock for low and moderate income communities.
(3) Has adopted a conflict of interest policy
consistent with the sample policy provided by the Internal
Revenue Service and requires its directors to serve without
compensation;
(4) Participates in large-scale residential energy
efficiency programs within the state; and
(5) Possesses the capacity to leverage private,
federal, and state funds to maximize the impact of the
assistance provided under this section."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB609 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 01-Apr-26.

John Treadwell
100 Clerk
101
102
103
104
105
106 Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed
107
108
109
Page 4